Delaware, session 153, HB157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Chapter 26A, Title 16 of the Delaware Code is repealed in its entirety. SYNOPSIS This Act repeals the Hearing Aid Loan Bank Program, as the program is no longer operational. The Program was created pursuant to Volume 74, Chapter 109 of the Laws of Delaware (2003), for the purpose of lending hearing aids on a temporary basis to children under 3 years old. Loans were initially for 6 months with possible 3-month extensions granted by the Program Manager. The need for the Hearing Aid Loan Bank Program has steadily decreased over time and the Program is now obsolete. As a result, the Division of Public Health no longer stocks the Hearing Aid Loan Bank.